New Jersey, session 221, A160.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law or rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto to the contrary, the Department of Agriculture shall not regulate the minimum property size required per number of hives for the purpose of keeping honeybees or related apiary activities. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.